apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="д/ом__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ома</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ому</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>омам</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оме</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>амы</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амоў</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амы</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амам</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амамі</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амах</l><r>ом<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="акн/о__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оў</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амі</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хлопчык__n_m_aa">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg2"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmpl2"/></e>
      <e><p><l>аў</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="погляд__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg2"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зе</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmpl1"/></e>
      <e><p><l>аў</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ст/ол__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>ол</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ол</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ала</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>алу</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>алом</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>але</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ал</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmpl1"/></e>
      <e><p><l>алоў</l><r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="крэсл/а__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nnsg1"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmpl1"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пір/ог__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>ог</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ог</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агу</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агом</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агу</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агі</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агі</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агоў</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агам</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агамі</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>агах</l><r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дв/ор__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>ор</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ор</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ара</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ару</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аром</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ары</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ары</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ары</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ароў</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арам</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арамі</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>арах</l><r>ор<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="стол"><i>ст</i><par n="ст/ол__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="пірог"><i>пір</i><par n="пір/ог__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="погляд"><i>погляд</i><par n="погляд__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="асфальт"><i>асфальт</i><par n="погляд__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="двор"><i>дв</i><par n="дв/ор__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="хлопчык"><i>хлопчык</i><par n="хлопчык__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="дом"><i>д</i><par n="д/ом__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="акно"><i>акн</i><par n="акн/о__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="крэсла"><i>крэсл</i><par n="крэсл/а__n_nt_nn"/></e>
